Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4012
Immunity from liability.

Law enforcement officials, their employees, and state officials shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under the Sex Offender Registration Act.

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 12.